Hawaii, session 2026, SB696.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the absence of tax
incentives for home fortification, grants for low-income
families to strengthen their homes, and efforts to create and
enhance hurricane shelter capacity stems from a lack of a
unified approach to securing funds and dedicated personnel to
plan and manage such initiatives. Currently, the Hawaii
emergency management agency is primarily focused on post­
disaster response efforts for events such as hurricanes,
tsunamis, or fires. The legislature believes that the State has
an obligation to provide sufficient funding and resources to
ensure that residents of the State are thoroughly prepared for a
natural disaster.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate
funds for the office of the governor, in collaboration with the
insurance division of the department of commerce and consumer
affairs, to:
(1) Plan and administer:
2025-0608 SB HMSO
IIIHIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIII

Page 2
S.B. NO. bl
(A) Income tax credits relating to emergency
management or disaster preparedness; and
(B) Grants for low-income taxpayers to fortify their
residential real property;
(2) Oversee the increase of emergency shelters; and
(3) Hire necessary personnel.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so
much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and
the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal
year 2026-2027 for the office of the governor, in collaboration
with the insurance division of the department of commerce and
consumer affairs, to:
(1) Plan and administer:
(A) Any income tax credits relating to emergency
management or disaster preparedness; and
(B) Grants for low-income taxpayers making eighty per
cent or less of the area median income to fortify
their residential real property;
(2) Oversee the development of emergency shelters,
including hurricane and tsunami shelters; and
2025-0608 SB HMSO

Page 3 S.B. NO. 64L
(3) Hire personnel as needed to carry out the purposes of
this Act.
The sums appropriated shall be expended by the office of
the governor for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
AwKa.Q_

INTRODUCED BY:
2025-0608 SB HMSO

S.B. NO. 646